Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.965

Voluntary change to electoral system.

The legislative authority of a city or town may authorize a change to its electoral system pursuant to RCW 29A.92.040.

[ 2018 c 113 s 206.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 113: See RCW 29A.92.005 and 29A.92.900.